Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATIONS; MINNEAPOLIS; ST. PAUL.new text end new text begin (a) $425,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $425,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for grants to the St. Paul Transportation Management Organization to provide programming, service expansion, and public education and information to support a reduction in vehicle miles traveled throughout the metropolitan area, including but not limited to staffing, communications, outreach, education program development, and operations management. new text end new text begin (b) $105,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $105,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for grants to the Downtown Minneapolis Transportation Management Organization to provide programming and service expansion, including but not limited to staffing, communications, outreach, education program development, and operations management. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must not retain any portion of the appropriations under this section and must make grant payments in full by July 1 of each year. The appropriations in paragraphs (a) and (b) are onetime appropriations. new text end